Utah statutes.
73-5a-101.   Power of state engineer to regulate dams.

(1)  The state engineer has the authority to regulate dams for the purpose of protecting public safety.

(2)  To protect life and property, the state engineer may make rules controlling the construction and operation of dams, including rules controlling:

(a)  design;

(b)  maintenance;

(c)  repair;

(d)  removal; and

(e)  abandonment.

(3)  The state engineer may by rule exempt from this chapter any dam that:

(a)  impounds less than 20 acre-feet of water and does not constitute a threat to human life if it fails; or

(b)  does not constitute a threat to human life and would result in only minor damage to property of the owner if it fails.



Enacted by Chapter 319, 1990 General Session

